Florida, session 2026, SB924.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 24 25 Section 1.âParagraph (b) of subsection (1) of section 26 720.3035, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 27 720.3035âArchitectural control covenants; parcel owner 28 improvements; rights and privileges.â 29 (1) 30 (b)âAn association or any architectural, construction 31 improvement, or other such similar committee of an association 32 may not enforce or adopt a covenant, rule, or guideline that: 33 1.âLimits or places requirements on the interior of a 34 structure that is not visible from the parcelâs frontage or an 35 adjacent parcel, an adjacent common area, or a community golf 36 course. 37 2.âRequires the review and approval of plans and 38 specifications for a central air-conditioning, refrigeration, 39 heating, or ventilating system by the association or any 40 architectural, construction improvement, or other such similar 41 committee of an association, if such system is not visible from 42 the parcelâs frontage, an adjacent parcel, an adjacent common 43 area, or a community golf course and is substantially similar to 44 a system that is approved or recommended by the association or a 45 committee thereof. 46 3.âRequires that a specific type of material be used on the 47 building or rebuilding of a roof, provided the built or rebuilt 48 roof appears to be substantially identical in shape and color 49 with the roofing requirements created by the association or any 50 architectural, construction improvement, or other such similar 51 committee of the association, and that such roofing materials 52 adhere to the roof systems recognized by the Florida Building 53 Code which meet ASCE 7-22 standards pursuant to paragraph 54 (6)(c). 55 Section 2.âParagraph (g) is added to subsection (3) of 56 section 720.3075, Florida Statutes, to read: 57 720.3075âProhibited clauses in association documents.â 58 (3)âHomeownersâ association documents, including 59 declarations of covenants, articles of incorporation, or bylaws, 60 may not preclude: 61 (g)âA property owner from using any type of building 62 material to build or rebuild his or her roof, provided the built 63 or rebuilt roof appears to be substantially identical in shape 64 and color with the roofing requirements created by the 65 association or any architectural, construction improvement, or 66 other such similar committee of the association, and that such 67 roofing materials adhere to the roof systems recognized by the 68 Florida Building Code which meet ASCE 7-22 standards pursuant to 69 s. 720.3035(6)(c). 70 Section 3.âSubsection (1) of section 720.303, Florida 71 Statutes, is amended to read: 72 720.303âAssociation powers and duties; meetings of board; 73 official records; budgets; financial reporting; association 74 funds; recalls.â 75 (1)âPOWERS AND DUTIES.âAn association that operates a 76 community as defined in s. 720.301 must be operated by an 77 association that is a Florida corporation. After October 1, 78 1995, the association must be incorporated and the initial 79 governing documents must be recorded in the official records of 80 the county in which the community is located. An association may 81 operate more than one community. The officers and directors of 82 an association are subject to s. 617.0830 and have a fiduciary 83 relationship to the members who are served by the association. 84 The powers and duties of an association include those set forth 85 in this chapter and, except as expressly limited or restricted 86 in this chapter, those set forth in the governing documents. 87 After control of the association is obtained by members other 88 than the developer, the association may institute, maintain, 89 settle, or appeal actions or hearings in its name on behalf of 90 all members concerning matters of common interest to the 91 members, including, but not limited to, the common areas; roof 92 or structural components of a building, or other improvements 93 for which the association is responsible; mechanical, 94 electrical, or plumbing elements serving an improvement or 95 building for which the association is responsible; 96 representations of the developer pertaining to any existing or 97 proposed commonly used facility; and protest of ad valorem taxes 98 on commonly used facilities. The association may defend actions 99 in eminent domain or bring inverse condemnation actions. Before 100 commencing litigation against any party in the name of the 101 association involving amounts in controversy in excess of 102 $100,000, the association must obtain the affirmative approval 103 of a majority of the voting interests at a meeting of the 104 membership at which a quorum has been attained. This subsection 105 does not limit any statutory or common-law right of any 106 individual member or class of members to bring any action 107 without participation by the association. A member does not have 108 authority to act for the association by virtue of being a 109 member. An association may have more than one class of members 110 and may issue membership certificates. An association of 15 or 111 fewer parcel owners may enforce only the requirements of those 112 deed restrictions established prior to the purchase of each 113 parcel upon an affected parcel owner or owners. 114 Section 4.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 115 made by this act to section 720.3035, Florida Statutes, in a 116 reference thereto, subsection (9) of section 617.0825, Florida 117 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 118 617.0825âBoard committees and advisory committees.â 119 (9)âThis section does not apply to a committee established 120 under chapter 718, chapter 719, or chapter 720 to perform the 121 functions set forth in s. 718.303(3), s. 719.303(3), s. 122 720.3035(1), s. 720.305(2), or s. 720.405, respectively. 123 Section 5.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.